Utah statutes.
17-36-34.   Special assessment.

Money received by the county treasurer from any special assessment shall be applied towards payment of the improvement for which the assessment was approved. Such money shall be used exclusively for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds or other indebtedness incurred to finance such improvements, except as provided in Section 17-36-29.

